Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1701
Public policy.

Sections 54-1701 to 54-1711 shall be deemed an exercise of the police powers of the State of Nebraska for the protection of the agricultural public to facilitate the control and prevention of diseases in domestic animals by requiring compliance with the laws of this state enacted for that purpose together with such regulations as may have been or may be made pursuant thereto. It is, therefor, declared to be the public policy of this state that all dealers as defined in sections 54-1701 to 54-1711 shall be subject to sections 54-1701 to 54-1711, and that all the provisions of sections 54-1701 to 54-1711 shall be liberally construed for the accomplishment of this purpose.

Laws 1969, c. 447, § 1, p. 1493.